Illinois, session 104th, HB1437.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Treasurer Act is amended by adding 5Section 17.2 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 505/17.2 new)7    Sec. 17.2. Non-profit investment pool.8    (a) The State Treasurer may establish and administer a 9non-profit investment pool and an electronic payment 10processing program to supplement and enhance investment 11opportunities and secure electronic payment options otherwise 12available to not-for-profit corporations in this State.13    (b) The Treasurer may receive funds paid into the 14non-profit investment pool by a not-for-profit corporation 15that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 16501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code for the purpose of 17holding and investing those funds. In order to be eligible to 18participate in the non-profit investment pool, the 19not-for-profit corporation shall provide the Treasurer with a 20copy of the most recent audited financial statement or 21charitable organization annual report filed with the Attorney 22General.23    (c) The Treasurer may invest the funds constituting the   HB1437 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08139 SPS 18185 b1non-profit investment pool in the same manner, in the same 2types of investments, and subject to the same limitations 3provided for the investment of funds in the State Treasury. 4The Treasurer shall develop, publish, and implement an 5investment policy covering the management of funds in the 6non-profit investment pool. The policy shall be published each 7year as part of the audit of the non-profit investment pool by 8the Auditor General, which shall be distributed to all 9participants. The Treasurer shall notify all non-profit 10investment pool participants in writing, and the Treasurer 11shall publish in at least one newspaper of general circulation 12in both Springfield and Chicago any changes to a previously 13published investment policy at least 30 calendar days before 14implementing the policy. Any investment policy adopted by the 15Treasurer shall be reviewed, and updated if necessary, within 1690 days after the installation of a new Treasurer.17    (d) The Treasurer shall adopt rules for the efficient 18administration of the non-profit investment pool, including 19the minimum amounts that may be deposited in the non-profit 20investment pool and the minimum period of time that deposits 21shall be retained in the non-profit investment pool. The rules 22shall provide for the administrative expenses of the 23non-profit investment pool to be paid from its earnings and 24for the interest earnings in excess of such expenses to be 25credited or paid monthly to the not-for-profit corporations 26participating in the non-profit investment pool in a manner   HB1437 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08139 SPS 18185 b1which equitably reflects the differing amounts of their 2respective investments in the non-profit investment pool and 3the differing periods of time for which the amounts were in the 4custody of the non-profit investment pool.5    (e) Upon creating a non-profit investment pool, the State 6Treasurer shall give bond with 2 or more sufficient sureties, 7payable to not-for-profit corporations that participate in the 8non-profit investment pool for the benefit of the 9not-for-profit corporations that have funds that are paid into 10the non-profit investment pool for investment, in the penal 11sum of $150,000, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the 12State Treasurer's duties in relation to the non-profit 13investment pool.